Massachusetts, session 194th, H4587.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, the Department of
Corrections (DOC) shall establish a sick leave bank for David A. Russell, an employee of the
office. Any employee of the office may voluntarily contribute 1 or more sick, personal or
vacation days to the sick leave bank for use by David A. Russell. If David A. Russell terminates
employment with the office or requests to dissolve the sick leave bank, any remaining time in the
sick leave bank shall be transferred to the extended illness leave bank. Sick leave bank days shall
not be used for absences unrelated to the illness or disability that necessitated the establishment
of the sick leave bank as determined by the office.
of 1